Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
CHAPTER 7 Registration, Operation, and Sale of Watercraft

Cross references.

Operation of boats on certain state park lakes, §

12-3-10

.

Liability of owner of watercraft for injury or damage caused by operation of watercraft, §§

51-1-21

,

51-1-22

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Motorboat Collisions and the Family Purpose Doctrine,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 473 (1966).

For note discussing the family purpose car doctrine as an extension of the principle of respondeat superior, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 112 (1966).